Maine, session 132, LD1560.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §2605, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 737, Pt. A, §2 and
Pt. C, §106 and amended by PL 1989, c. 6; c. 9, §2; and c. 104, Pt. C, §§8 and 10, is further
amended to read:
2. Contracts. A contract, other than a contract obtained through properly advertised
bid procedures, made by a municipality, county or quasi-municipal corporation during the
term of an official of a body of the municipality, county or quasi-municipal corporation
involved in the negotiation or award of the contract who has a direct or an indirect
pecuniary interest in it the contract is voidable, except as provided in subsection 4. A
contract, even if the contract was obtained through properly advertised bid procedures,
made by a municipality during the term of an official of the municipality involved in the
negotiation or award of the contract who has a direct or an indirect pecuniary interest in the
contract is voidable, except as provided in subsection 4.
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §2605, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 737, Pt. A, §2 and
Pt. C, §106 and amended by PL 1989, c. 6; c. 9, §2; and c. 104, Pt. C, §§8 and 10, is further
amended by enacting after the first blocked paragraph a new blocked paragraph to read:
If the municipality determines that no other option is feasible but to award a municipal
contract to an official who is an officer, director, partner, associate, employee or
stockholder of a private corporation, business or other economic entity to which the
question relates or with which the unit of a municipality contracts, the municipality must
appoint an independent board of 3 residents to address grievances against the business
practices of the officer, director, partner, associate, employee or stockholder of a private
corporation, business or other economic entity for the life of the contract.